Montana, session 2025, HB551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Program to eliminate reduced-price copayments for school lunch and breakfast --
legislative intent -- rulemaking. (1) The legislature intends to strengthen the opportunity of each child to
develop the child's full education potential in accordance with the goal of the people articulated in Article X,
section 1(1), of the Montana constitution. The legislature recognizes that:
(a) adequate and proper nutrition is a foundational requirement for learning; and
(b) requiring families that are eligible for reduced-price school meals under the federal school
breakfast program and the national school lunch program to contribute to the cost of meals creates a barrier for
participation and a burden for school administrators for accounting and collection.
(2) From money appropriated for this purpose, the superintendent of public instruction shall
administer a program to distribute replacement funds to school districts electing to eliminate required reduced-
price copayments from reduced-price eligible pupils for school lunch and breakfast under a national or federal
program.
(3) If the amount of appropriated funds is insufficient for the program, the superintendent of public
instruction:
(a) may accept donations from private or out-of-state public sources to support the program; and
(b) shall request additional funding sufficient to support the program in the subsequent biennium.
(4) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules necessary to administer the program.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 551
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 551
(5) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Reduced-price copayment" means the amount a reduced-price eligible pupil is charged for
reduced-price school meals.
(b) "Reduced-price eligible pupil" means a pupil whose family income meets the federal income
eligibility requirements for reduced-price school meals pursuant to the federal school breakfast program and the
national school lunch program.
Section 2. Appropriation. (1) The following money is appropriated from the state general fund to the
office of public instruction to be used for the purposes described in [section 1]:
Fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 $600,000
Fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026 $600,000
(2) The legislature intends that the appropriation in subsection (1) be considered part of the
ongoing base for the next legislative session.
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
20, chapter 10, part 2, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 10, part 2, apply to [section 1].
Section 4. Coordination instruction. If both House Bill No. 2 and [this act] are passed and
approved, then the following provisions in House Bill No. 2 are void:
(1) the appropriations for "School Lunch Funding"; and
(2) the sentence that reads: "If HB 551 is passed and approved and contains an appropriation for
School Lunch Funding, the School Lunch Funding appropriation is void."
Section 5. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 551
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 551, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 551
INTRODUCED BY M. ROMANO, J. REAVIS, B. EDWARDS, J. ISALY, M. LEE, P. STRAND, T. CROWE, J.
SECKINGER, B. CLOSE, S. FYANT, J. WEBER, J. SOOKTIS, A. GRIFFITH, D. POWERS, M. CUNNINGHAM,
T. RUNNING WOLF, F. SMITH, D. BAUM, B. CARTER, J. COHENOUR, D. HAWK, J. KARLEN, C. KEOGH, K.
KORTUM, E. STAFMAN, P. TUSS, Z. ZEPHYR, M. MARLER, S. DEMAROIS, J. LYNCH
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A STATE PROGRAM TO PROVIDE REPLACEMENT FUNDING FOR SCHOOL
DISTRICTS THAT ELIMINATE REDUCED-PRICE COPAYMENTS FOR SCHOOL LUNCH AND BREAKFAST;
PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING AN
EFFECTIVE DATE.”